District of Columbia statutes.
42-3254

Rules and procedures.

The Mayor is authorized to promulgate rules and to establish procedures to implement this chapter.

Apr. 8, 2005, D.C. Law 15-303, § 5, 52 DCR 1690

History

For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 5 of Multiple Dwelling Residence Water Lead Level Test Temporary Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-206, December 7, 2004, law notification 52 DCR 450).

Temporary Addition of Section

Delegation of Authority to the Director, Department of Health, see Mayor’s Order 2005-102, June 17, 2005 ( 52 DCR 8169).

Delegation of Authority